Tennessee, session 114, SB0038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Waste Reduction
and Recycling Act (TWRRA)."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-211-871(a), is amended by
deleting "January 1" and substituting "January 10".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0038
000976
- 1 -